Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 346.021, is amended to read: 346.021 FINDER TO GIVE NOTICE. new text begin (a) new text end A person who finds an estray and knows who owns the estray must notify the estray's owner within seven days after finding the estray and request that the owner pay all reasonable charges and take the estray away. A finder who does not know who owns an estray must either: (1) within ten days, file a notice with the town or city clerk and post a physical or online notice of the finding of the estray. The notice must briefly describe the estray or provide a photograph of the estray, provide the residence or contact information of the finder, and provide the approximate location and time when the finder found the estray; or (2) within seven days, surrender the estray to a local animal control agency or to a kennel as defined in section 347.31, subdivision 2. new text begin (b) For the failure to give the notice required in paragraph (a), the finder is liable to the owner of the estray in double the amount of damages sustained by the owner. new text end